Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2445
Carrying concealed weapon under other law; act; how construed.

Nothing in the Concealed Handgun Permit Act prevents a person not otherwise prohibited from possessing or carrying a concealed handgun by state law from carrying a concealed weapon without a permit.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 22.